Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 8. 2013 Large Project Funding [Repealed]

§ 9-15-801.
Alexander Ranch conservation easement. [Repealed]

History.

2013 ch. 83, § 1, § 1, effective February 27, 2013; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-802.
Wood Ranch conservation easement. [Repealed]

History.

2013 ch. 83, § 1, § 1, effective February 27, 2013; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-803.
Arrowhead Ranch conservation easement. [Repealed]

History.

2013 ch. 83, § 1, § 1, effective February 27, 2013; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-804.
Wilson Ranch conservation easement. [Repealed]

History.

2013 ch. 83, § 1, § 1, effective February 27, 2013; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-805.
Big Horn River invasives. [Repealed]

History.

2013 ch. 83, § 1, § 1, effective February 27, 2013; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-806.
Cabins Ranch conservation easement. [Repealed]

History.

2013 ch. 83, § 1, § 1, effective February 27, 2013; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-807.
Culbertson Place conservation easement. [Repealed]

History.

2013 ch. 83, § 1, § 1, effective February 27, 2013; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-808.
Rolling Thunder conservation easement. [Repealed]

History.

2013 ch. 83, § 1, § 1, effective February 27, 2013; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-809.
Barnes Ranch conservation easement. [Repealed]

History.

2013 ch. 83, § 1, § 1, effective February 27, 2013; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-810.
Red Creek conservation easement. [Repealed]

History.

2013 ch. 83, § 1, § 1, effective February 27, 2013; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-811.
Shell Oil Farson IV. [Repealed]

History.

2013 ch. 83, § 1, § 1, effective February 27, 2013; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-812.
Munger Mountain conservation easement. [Repealed]

History.

2013 ch. 83, § 1, § 1, effective February 27, 2013; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-813.
East Gros Ventre Butte conservation easement. [Repealed]

History.

2013 ch. 83, § 1, § 1, effective February 27, 2013; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-814.
Charlie Ball Place conservation easement. [Repealed]

History.

2013 ch. 83, § 1, § 1, effective February 27, 2013; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-815.
A Bar One conservation easement. [Repealed]

History.

2013 ch. 83, § 1, § 1, effective February 27, 2013; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-816.
Cottonwood Ranch habitat restoration. [Repealed]

History.

2013 ch. 83, § 1, § 1, effective February 27, 2013; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-817.
Jaw Bone Gulch conservation easement. [Repealed]

History.

2013 ch. 83, § 1, § 1, effective February 27, 2013; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.